Utah statutes.
63A-2-104.   Delegation of general services to departments or agencies --
Writing required -- Contents -- Termination.
(1)  The director of the Division of Purchasing and General Services, with the
approval of the executive director, may delegate, in writing, his authority to
perform or control any general services function to other state agencies and
institutions by contract or other means authorized by law, if:
(a)  in the judgment of the executive director, the state department or agency
has requested the authority; and
(b)  the state department or agency has the necessary resources and skills to
perform or control the functions.
(2)  The director may delegate his authority only when the delegation would
result in net cost savings or improved service delivery to the state as a
whole.
(3)  The written delegation shall contain the following:
(a)  a precise definition of each function to be delegated;
(b)  a clear description of the standards to be met in performing each
function delegated;
(c)  a provision for periodic administrative audits by the department; and
(d)  a date on which the agreement shall terminate if not previously
terminated or renewed.
(4)  An agreement to delegate functions to a state agency or institution may
be terminated by the department if the results of administrative audits
conducted by the department reveal lack of compliance with the terms of the
agreement.
